Connecticut, session 2026, HB05243.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) There is established a working
group to develop a plan relating to economic development and tourism
in the greater Mystic area. Such plan shall include, but need not be
limited to, an examination of (1) the potential federal, state or other
sources of funding for the restoration of any breakwater located in
Stonington Harbor, (2) transportation options to ease traffic congestion
and alleviate parking pressure, and (3) potential easements and
infrastructure improvements to enhance accessibility and coastal
resiliency. For the purposes of this subsection, "the greater Mystic area"
means the towns of Groton and Stonington.
(b) The working group shall consist of the following members: (1) The
chairpersons and ranking members of the joint standing committee of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to
commerce, or their designees; (2) the state representatives and state
senators of the General Assembly representing the town of Groton, or
their designees; (3) the state representatives and state senators of the
General Assembly representing the town of Stonington, or their

Substitute House Bill No. 5243
designees; (4) the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, or
the secretary's designee; (5) the Commissioner of Economic and
Community Development, or the commissioner's designee; (6) the
Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection, or the
commissioner's designee; (7) the Commissioner of Transportation, or
the commissioner's designee; (8) the chief elected official of Groton, or
the official's designee; (9) the chief elected official of Stonington, or the
official's designee; (10) a representative of a regional economic
development organization; (11) a representative of a chamber of
commerce; (12) a representative of the Bureau of Aquaculture of the
Department of Agriculture; and (13) any individuals the chairpersons of
the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to commerce deem relevant and
necessary to carry out the duties of the working group, including, but
not limited to, a representative of the local traffic authority of the town
of Groton and a representative of the local traffic authority of the town
of Stonington.
(c) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to commerce
shall serve as administrative staff of the working group.
(d) Not later than February 1, 2027, the working group shall submit a
report on its findings and recommendations to the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to commerce, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a
of the general statutes. The working group shall terminate on the date
that it submits such report or February 1, 2027, whichever is later.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 2, 2026
Special Act No. 26-30 2 of 2